Hawaii, session 2026, SB2093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 342L-62, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  The advisory committee shall hold at least one regular meeting during each calendar quarter; provided that one meeting each year shall be convened outside of normal business hours.  The advisory committee shall study issues related to leaks of field‑constructed underground fuel storage tanks at the Red Hill Bulk Fuel Storage Facility, Kuahua Peninsula, Pacific Missile Range Facility Barking Sands, Hickam Pol Annex, and Schofield Barracks Military Reservation.  The advisory committee shall consider: (1)  The short- and long-term effects of leaks of the fuel tanks, including effects relating to the health of residents, safe drinking water, and the environment; (2)  Response strategies to mitigate the effects of leaks from fuel tanks; (3)  Methods to improve communication between the United States Navy, Air Force, and Army; the State; any local board of water supply; and the public in the event of a leak of any fuel tank; (4)  Groundwater test results in relation to the surrounding areas of fuel tank facilities, with a particular emphasis on the groundwater near the Red Hill Bulk Fuel Storage Facility; (5)  The implications of shutting down any fuel tank facility; and (6)  Updates on progress toward meeting goals of agreement between the State, the affected county, and the federal government." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the fuel tank advisory committee to hold additional regular meetings, including contracting with a third-party administrator to provide support. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.